Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.072

Aggravation, diminution, or termination of disability.

(1) If aggravation, diminution, or termination of disability takes place, the director may, upon the application of the beneficiary, made within seven years from the date the first closing order becomes final, or at any time upon his or her own motion, readjust the rate of compensation in accordance with the rules in this section provided for the same, or in a proper case terminate the payment. The director may, upon application of the victim made at any time, provide proper and necessary medical and surgical services as authorized under RCW 7.68.095.

(2) "Closing order" as used in this section means an order based on factors which include medical recommendation, advice, examination, or the maximum benefit has been met.

[ 2011 c 346 s 404.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.